District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Child Abuse Investigation Multidisciplinary Team Certification
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977, effective September 23,
1977 (D.C. Law 2-22; D.C. Official Code § 4-1301.51 et seq) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 102(2B) (D.C. Official Code § 4-1301.02), is amended as follows:
“(2B) “CAC” means an accredited Children’ s Advocacy Center under an
agreement for services with the District of Columbia.”
(b) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
“(c) The MDT shall make reasonable efforts to enter into an agreement for services with
an accredited Children’s Advocacy Center for the purposes of coordinating the MDT
investigation. The absence of a CAC shall not constitute grounds for the District’s investigating


authority to delay or fail to carry out an MDT investigation.
(c) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) The CAC serving as a member of the MDT shall, on an annual basis for the life of its
service agreement, provide the D.C. Council with documentation reflecting its accreditation
status in good standing by a national accrediting body with demonstrated expertise in the CAC
model.”
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.